North Dakota statutes. TITLE 51 Sales and Exchanges
CHAPTER 51-17.1 Currency Exchange Businesses

51-17.1-01.
Currency exchange — Penalty.

A nonbanking institution may engage in the business of a currency exchange if:

The institution does not contract with another person to manage the currency exchange business; however, this does not prohibit the business from employing individuals to operate a currency exchange business;

The institution displays in a prominent manner on the premises of the business the fees charged to exchange currency;

The maximum fees charged to exchange currency are limited to any direct cost of verification fees and:

The greater of five percent of the face amount or five dollars, for cashing a draft, personal check, payroll check, traveler’s check, or money order; and

The greater of three percent of the face amount or five dollars, for cashing a state public assistance check or a federal social security check;

The institution does not accept money or currency for deposit or act as bailee or agent of persons to hold money or currency in escrow for others for any purpose; and

The institution does not exchange currency on the premises of a charitable gaming site.

For purposes of this section, “currency exchange” means cashing a check, draft, money order, or traveler’s check or issuing a money order or traveler’s check as an agent for another, for a fee. The term does not include providing these services incidental to a primary business if there is not a charge for cashing a check or draft.

This section does not authorize a business to make any type of loan, including a deferred presentment service transaction, payday loan, cash advance, payday cash advance, or motor vehicle title loan.

A nonbanking institution may not accept a postdated check in a currency exchange transaction.

A person violating this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 444, § 1.